Washington statutes.
RCW 4.72.080

Construction of chapter—Time limitations when fraud, misrepresentation concerned.

The provisions of this chapter shall not be so construed as to affect the power of the court to vacate or modify judgments or orders as elsewhere in this code provided; nor shall the time limitations set forth in this chapter within which proceedings to vacate or modify a judgment must be started apply to a judgment heretofore or hereafter entered by consent or stipulation where the grounds to vacate or modify such judgment are based on fraud or misrepresentation, or when after the entry of the judgment either party fails to fulfill the terms and conditions on which the consent judgment or stipulation was entered; nor shall any judgment of acquittal in a criminal action be vacated under the provisions of this chapter.

[ 1961 c 88 s 1; 1891 c 27 s 4; RRS s 472.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: The words "this code" appeared in 1891 c 27 s 4.